src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-23kiilj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kiiĺ: # Noun (23) kiiĺ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Nom: kiiĺ
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Gen: keele
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Par: kiilt
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ill: kiilde
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ine: keelen
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ela: keelest
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+All: keelele
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ade: keelel
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Abl: keelelt
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Tra: keeles
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Ter: keeleniq
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Abe: keeleldäq
     kiiĺ+N+Sg+Com: keelegaq
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Nom: keeleq
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Gen: kiili
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Par: kiili
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ill: kiilihe
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ine: keelin
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ela: keelist
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+All: keelile
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ade: keelil
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Abl: keelilt
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Tra: keelis
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Ter: keeliniq
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Abe: keelildäq
     kiiĺ+N+Pl+Com: kiiligaq
